zh-CN: 燃油系统类型: 化油器式; 直喷 (GDI); 双喷射（进气道 + 直喷）; 机械式燃油喷射; 多点燃油喷射 (MPFI); 单点喷射 (SPI); 节气门体喷射 (TBI); 其他
es: Tipo de sistema de combustible: Carburado; Inyección directa (GDI); Doble inyección (puerto + directa); Inyección mecánica de combustible; Inyección multipuerto de combustible (MPFI); Inyección de punto único (SPI); Inyección en el cuerpo del acelerador (TBI); Otro
vi: Loại hệ thống nhiên liệu: Bộ chế hòa khí; Phun trực tiếp (GDI); Phun kép (cửa hút + trực tiếp); Phun nhiên liệu cơ học; Phun nhiên liệu đa điểm (MPFI); Phun đơn điểm (SPI); Phun qua bướm ga (TBI); Khác
en: Fuel system type: Carbureted; Direct injection (GDI); Dual injection (port + direct); Mechanical fuel injection; Multiport fuel injection (MPFI); Single-point injection (SPI); Throttle-body injection (TBI); Other
el: Τύπος συστήματος καυσίμου: Με καρμπιρατέρ; Άμεσος ψεκασμός (GDI); Διπλός ψεκασμός (πολλαπλής + άμεσος); Μηχανικός ψεκασμός καυσίμου; Ψεκασμός καυσίμου πολλαπλών σημείων (MPFI); Ψεκασμός μονού σημείου (SPI); Ψεκασμός στην πεταλούδα γκαζιού (TBI); Άλλο
tr: Yakıt sistemi tipi: Karbüratörlü; Doğrudan enjeksiyon (GDI); Çift enjeksiyon (port + doğrudan); Mekanik yakıt enjeksiyonu; Çok noktalı yakıt enjeksiyonu (MPFI); Tek noktalı enjeksiyon (SPI); Gaz kelebeği gövdesi enjeksiyonu (TBI); Diğer
fi: Polttoainejärjestelmän tyyppi: Kaasutin; Suoraruiskutus (GDI); Kaksoisruiskutus (epäsuora + suora); Mekaaninen polttoaineen ruiskutus; Monipisteruiskutus (MPFI); Yksipisteruiskutus (SPI); Kaasuläppäkoteloruiskutus (TBI); Muu
zh-TW: 燃油系統類型: 化油器式; 缸內直噴 (GDI); 雙噴射 (進氣歧管 + 缸內直噴); 機械式燃油噴射; 多點燃油噴射 (MPFI); 單點噴射 (SPI); 節氣門噴射 (TBI); 其他
ko: 연료 시스템 유형: 카뷰레터식; 직접 분사식(GDI); 듀얼 분사식(포트 + 직접); 기계식 연료 분사; 다중 포트 연료 분사(MPFI); 단일 포트 분사(SPI); 스로틀 바디 분사(TBI); 기타
nb: Type drivstoffsystem: Med forgasser; Direkte innsprøytning (GDI); Dobbel innsprøytning (port + direkte); Mekanisk drivstoffinnsprøytning; Flerports drivstoffinnsprøytning (MPFI); Enkeltpunkts innsprøytning (SPI); Gasspjeldinnsprøytning (TBI); Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava goriva: S rasplinjačem; Izravno ubrizgavanje (GDI); Dvostruko ubrizgavanje (u granu i izravno); Mehaničko ubrizgavanje goriva; Višetočkovno ubrizgavanje goriva (MPFI); Jednotočkovno ubrizgavanje (SPI); Ubrizgavanje u kućište leptira (TBI); Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema de combustível: Carburado; Injeção direta (GDI); Injeção dupla (porta e direta); Injeção mecânica de combustível; Injeção multiponto de combustível (MPFI); Injeção monoponto (SPI); Injeção em corpo de borboleta (TBI); Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema za gorivo: Z uplinjačem; Neposredno vbrizgavanje (GDI); Dvojno vbrizgavanje (večtočkovno in neposredno); Mehansko vbrizgavanje goriva; Večtočkovno vbrizgavanje goriva (MPFI); Enotočkovno vbrizgavanje (SPI); Vbrizgavanje na loputi za plin (TBI); Drugo
sk-SK: Typ palivového systému: Karburátorový; Priame vstrekovanie (GDI); Dvojité vstrekovanie (nepriame + priame); Mechanické vstrekovanie paliva; Viacbodové vstrekovanie paliva (MPFI); Jednobodové vstrekovanie (SPI); Vstrekovanie do telesa škrtiacej klapky (TBI); Iný
it: Tipo di sistema di alimentazione del carburante: A carburatore; Iniezione diretta (GDI); Doppia iniezione (indiretta e diretta); Iniezione meccanica; Iniezione multipoint (MPFI); Iniezione single-point (SPI); Iniezione nel corpo farfallato (TBI); Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de combustível: Carburado; Injeção direta (GDI); Injeção dupla (pórtico + direta); Injeção de combustível mecânica; Injeção de combustível multiponto (MPFI); Injeção monoponto (SPI); Injeção no corpo da borboleta (TBI); Outro
pl: Typ układu paliwowego: Gaźnikowy; Wtrysk bezpośredni (GDI); Wtrysk podwójny (pośredni + bezpośredni); Mechaniczny wtrysk paliwa; Wielopunktowy wtrysk paliwa (MPFI); Jednopunktowy wtrysk paliwa (SPI); Wtrysk jednopunktowy (TBI); Inny
ru: Тип топливной системы: Карбюраторная; Прямой впрыск (GDI); Двойной впрыск (распределенный + прямой); Механический впрыск топлива; Многоточечный впрыск (MPFI); Моновпрыск (SPI); Впрыск в дроссельную заслонку (TBI); Другое
nl: Type brandstofsysteem: Met carburateur; Directe injectie (GDI); Dubbele injectie (poort + direct); Mechanische brandstofinjectie; Multi-point brandstofinjectie (MPFI); Single-point injectie (SPI); Throttle-body-injectie (TBI); Anders
lt-LT: Degalų sistemos tipas: Karbiuratorinė; Tiesioginis įpurškimas (GDI); Dvigubas įpurškimas (į kanalą ir tiesioginis); Mechaninis kuro įpurškimas; Daugiataškis kuro įpurškimas (MPFI); Vienataškis įpurškimas (SPI); Įpurškimas į droselinę sklendę (TBI); Kita
cs: Typ palivového systému: Karburátor; Přímé vstřikování (GDI); Duální vstřikování (do sání + přímé); Mechanické vstřikování paliva; Vícebodové vstřikování paliva (MPFI); Jednobodové vstřikování paliva (SPI); Vstřikování do tělesa škrticí klapky (TBI); Ostatní
fr: Type de système d'alimentation: À carburateur; Injection directe (GDI); Double injection (indirecte et directe); Injection mécanique de carburant; Injection de carburant multipoint (MPFI); Injection monopoint (SPI); Injection dans le corps de papillon (TBI); Autre
bg-BG: Тип горивна система: Карбураторна; Директен инжекцион (GDI); Двоен инжекцион (порт + директен); Механичен инжекцион; Многоточков инжекцион (MPFI); Едноточков инжекцион (SPI); Инжекцион в дроселовата клапа (TBI); Друго
hu: Üzemanyagrendszer típusa: Karburátoros; Közvetlen befecskendezéses (GDI); Kettős befecskendezéses (szívócső + közvetlen); Mechanikus befecskendezéses; Hengerek szerinti (többpontos) befecskendezéses (MPFI); Központi (egypontos) befecskendezéses (SPI); Központi (fojtószelepházba) befecskendezéses (TBI); Egyéb
da: Brændstofsystemtype: Karburator; Direkte indsprøjtning (GDI); Dobbelt indsprøjtning (port + direkte); Mekanisk brændstofindsprøjtning; Flerpunkts brændstofindsprøjtning (MPFI); Enkeltpunktsindsprøjtning (SPI); Indsprøjtning i spjældhus (TBI); Andet
de: Typ des Kraftstoffsystems: Vergaser; Direkteinspritzung (GDI); Duale Einspritzung (Saugrohr + Direkt); Mechanische Kraftstoffeinspritzung; Mehrpunkteinspritzung (MPFI); Zentraleinspritzung (SPI); Drosselklappeneinspritzung (TBI); Sonstige
ja: 燃料システムタイプ: キャブレター式; 直噴 (GDI); デュアルインジェクション (ポート + 直噴); メカニカル燃料噴射; マルチポート燃料噴射 (MPFI); シングルポイントインジェクション (SPI); スロットルボディインジェクション (TBI); その他
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de alimentare cu combustibil: Cu carburator; Injecție directă (GDI); Injecție dublă (indirectă + directă); Injecție mecanică de combustibil; Injecție multipunct (MPFI); Injecție monopunct (SPI); Injecție în corpul clapetei (TBI); Altele
sv: Typ av bränslesystem: Med förgasare; Direktinsprutning (GDI); Dubbel insprutning (port + direkt); Mekanisk bränsleinsprutning; Flerpunktsinsprutning (MPFI); Enpunktsinsprutning (SPI); Spjällhusinsprutning (TBI); Övrigt
th: ประเภทระบบเชื้อเพลิง: คาร์บูเรเตอร์; ฉีดตรง (GDI); ฉีดคู่ (พอร์ต + ฉีดตรง); หัวฉีดเชื้อเพลิงแบบกลไก; หัวฉีดเชื้อเพลิงหลายจุด (MPFI); หัวฉีดจุดเดียว (SPI); หัวฉีดที่เรือนลิ้นปีกผีเสื้อ (TBI); อื่นๆ